Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.140

Teachers' training courses.

The University of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College are each authorized to train teachers and other personnel for whom teaching certificates or special credentials prescribed by the Washington professional educator standards board are required, for any grade, level, department, or position of the public schools of the state.

[ 2005 c 497 s 217; 2004 c 60 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.140. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 17; 1949 c 34 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4618-3. Formerly RCW 28.76.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.